Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 1. In General.

§ 23-15-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Election Code.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-3.
Definition of “ballot box.”

For purposes of this chapter, the term “ballot box” includes any ballot bag or other container of a type that has been approved for use in elections by the Secretary of State and is capable of receiving voted paper ballots. Such ballot bags or containers may be used for any purpose that a ballot box may be used under the provisions of law regulating elections in Mississippi or any other purpose authorized by the rules and regulations adopted by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 596, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-5.
Elections Support Fund created; use of funds; deposit of portion of monies into State General Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Elections Support Fund. Monies derived from annual report fees imposed upon limited liability companies under Section 79-29-1203 shall be deposited into the Elections Support Fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be disbursed as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The expenditure of monies in the fund shall be under the direction of the Secretary of State as provided by subsection (2) of this section, and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Finance and Administration.

Monies in the fund shall be used as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) of the monies in the special fund shall be distributed annually to the counties, upon appropriation of the Legislature, based on the proportion that the population of a county bears to the total population in all counties of the state population according to the most recent information from the United States Census Bureau, and held in a separate fund solely for the purpose of acquiring, upgrading, maintaining or repairing voting equipment, systems and supplies, hiring temporary technical support, conducting elections using such voting equipment or systems, employing such personnel to conduct an election, and training election officials; and

The remaining fifty percent (50%) of the monies in the special fund shall be deposited in the State General Fund.

The Secretary of State shall create standard training guidelines to assist counties in training election officials with the funds authorized under subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section. Any criteria established by the Secretary of State for the purposes of this section shall be used in addition to any other training or coursework prescribed by the Secretary of State to train circuit clerks, poll managers and any other election officials participating in county elections.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no monies from the Elections Support Fund shall be used by the Secretary of State or any person associated with the Office of the Secretary of State to provide or otherwise support expert testimony in any manner for any hearing, trial or election contest.

From and after July 1, 2017, none of the monies deposited in the Elections Support Fund may be used to reimburse or otherwise defray any costs that the Office of the Secretary of State may incur in administering the fund.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 45; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 2; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

§ 23-15-7.
Mississippi Voter Identification Card.

The Secretary of State shall negotiate a Memorandum of Understanding which shall be entered into by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the registrar of each county for the purpose of providing a Mississippi Voter Identification Card. The card shall be valid for the purpose of voter identification purposes under Section 23-15-563 and available only to registered voters of this state. No fee shall be charged or collected for the application for or issuance of a Mississippi Voter Identification Card. Any costs associated with the application for or issuance of a Mississippi Voter Identification Card shall be made payable from the state’s General Fund.

The registrar of each county shall provide a location in the registrar’s office at which he or she shall accept applications for Mississippi Voter Identification Cards in accordance with the Mississippi Constitution; however, in counties having two (2) judicial districts the registrar shall provide a location in the registrar’s office in each judicial district at which he or she shall accept applications for Mississippi Voter Identification Cards in accordance with the Mississippi Constitution.

No person shall be eligible for a Mississippi Voter Identification Card if the person has a valid unexpired Mississippi driver’s license or an identification card issued under Section 45-35-1 et seq.

The Mississippi Voter Identification Card shall be captioned “MISSISSIPPI VOTER IDENTIFICATION CARD” and shall contain a prominent statement that under Mississippi law it is valid only as identification for voting purposes. The identification card shall include the following information regarding the applicant:

Full legal name;

Legal residence address;

Mailing address, if different; and

Voting information.

The Mississippi Voter Identification Card shall also contain the date the voter identification card was issued, the county in which the voter is registered and such other information as required by the Secretary of State.

The application shall be signed and sworn to by the applicant and any falsification or fraud in the making of the application shall constitute false swearing under Section 97-7-35.

The registrar shall require presentation and verification of any of the following information during the application process before issuance of a Mississippi Voter Identification Card:

A photo identity document; or

Documentation showing the person’s date and place of birth; or

A social security card; or

A Medicare card; or

A Medicaid card; or

Such other acceptable evidence of verification of residence in the county as determined by the Secretary of State.

A Mississippi Voter Identification Card shall remain valid for as long as the cardholder remains qualified to vote. It shall be the duty of a person who moves his or her residence within this state to surrender his or her voter identification card to the registrar of the county of his or her new residence and that person may thereafter apply for and receive a new card if such person is eligible under this section. It shall be the duty of a person who moves his or her residence outside this state or who ceases to be qualified to vote to surrender his or her card to the registrar who issued it.

The Secretary of State, in conjunction with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, shall adopt rules and regulations for the administration of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 526, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).